North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53C. Regulation of Banks.
Article 3. Organization of a Bank.

§ 53C-3-1.
Application to organize a bank.

An applicant for permission to organize a bank and for a charter must file an application with the Commissioner. The application shall be in the form required by the Commissioner and shall contain such information as the Commissioner requires, set forth in sufficient detail to enable the Commissioner to evaluate the applicant’s satisfaction of the criteria set forth in

G.S. 53C-3-4

. The applicant shall pay a nonrefundable application fee as provided by rule at the time of filing the application.

Upon receipt of an application, the Commissioner shall conduct an examination of the applicant and any other matters deemed relevant by the Commissioner. The Commissioner may require additional information and may require the amendment of the application in the course of the examination. An applicant’s failure to furnish all required information or to pay the required fee within 30 days after filing the application may be considered an abandonment of the application.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-3-2.
Permission to organize a bank.

With the approval of the Commissioner, the organizers may file articles of incorporation for the proposed bank with the Secretary of State. The Commissioner shall authorize the organization of the proposed bank if the Commissioner is satisfied that each of the following conditions is met:

The application is complete.

The Commissioner’s examination as provided for in

G.S. 53C-3-1

indicates that the requirements for the issuance of a charter to the applicant are reasonably probable of satisfaction.

The proposed name of the proposed bank is not likely to mislead the public as to its character or purpose and is not the same as a name already adopted by an existing depository institution or trust institution operating in this State.

If the Commissioner approves the organization of the proposed bank, the Commissioner shall issue a certificate to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall transmit to the Commissioner a certified copy of the filed articles of incorporation of the proposed bank.

Unless and until the Commissioner issues a charter to the proposed bank:

The proposed bank shall not transact any business except such as is incidental and necessary to its organization or the application for a charter or preparation for commencing the business of banking.

All funds paid for shares of the proposed bank shall be placed in escrow under a written escrow with a third-party escrow agent satisfactory to the Commissioner.

All funds for shares placed into escrow, and all dividends or interest on such funds, may be removed from escrow only with the Commissioner’s approval except to the extent that such funds are refunded to subscribers or as otherwise required by law.

A proposed bank is subject to the jurisdiction of the Commissioner.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-3-3.
Articles of incorporation of a proposed bank.

The articles of incorporation of a proposed bank shall be signed and acknowledged by or on behalf of an organizer and shall contain the following:

The information required to be set forth in articles of incorporation under Chapter 55 of the General Statutes.

Any provision consistent with Chapter 55 of the General Statutes and other applicable law that the organizers elect to set forth for the regulation of the internal affairs of the proposed bank and that the Commissioner authorizes or requires.

Any provision the Commissioner requires or authorizes as a substitute for a provision that otherwise would be required by Chapter 55 of the General Statutes.

Before the chartering of a proposed bank, the articles of incorporation filed under the provisions of

G.S. 53C-3-2

shall be sufficient certification to the FDIC that the proposed bank is a legal entity.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-3-4.
Commissioner’s approval of charter issuance.

The Commissioner may approve a charter for a proposed bank only when the Commissioner has determined that all the following requirements have been satisfied or are reasonably probable to be satisfied within a reasonable period of time specified by the Commissioner in the order of approval:

The proposed bank has solicited or will solicit subscriptions for purchases of shares sufficient to provide an amount of required capital satisfactory to the Commissioner for the commencement of the business of banking.

All prior public solicitations for purchases of shares and all future solicitations will be solicited with appropriate disclosure, taking into account all the circumstances of the public solicitation, including a prominent statement in any solicitation document to the effect that the solicitation has not been approved by the Commissioner or the Commission and that a representation to the contrary is a criminal offense.

All payments for purchases of shares in a bank in organization are made in United States currency.

The proposed bank has an operational expense fund from which to pay organizational expenses, in an amount determined by the Commissioner to be sufficient for the safe and sound operation of the proposed bank while the charter application is pending.

The proposed bank has been formed for legitimate and lawful business purposes.

The character, competence, and experience of the organizers, proposed directors, proposed officers, and initial holders of more than ten percent (10%) of the voting securities of the proposed bank will command the confidence of the public.

The proposed officers and directors, as a group, have degrees of character, competence, and experience sufficient to justify a belief that the proposed bank will be free from improper or unlawful influence and otherwise will operate safely, soundly, and in compliance with law.

The anticipated volume and nature of business of the proposed bank projected in the application are reasonable and indicate a reasonable probability of safe, sound, and profitable operation of the proposed bank.

If the proposed bank intends to conduct “trust business,” as defined by G.S. 53C-1-4(70), it appears that trust powers should be granted based on consideration of the various factors set forth in Article 24 of Chapter 53 of the General Statutes for considering applications and setting capital for a State trust company.

The Commissioner’s determination that the requirements described in subsection (a) are reasonably probable of satisfaction may be based on partial satisfaction of the requirements at a level set by the Commissioner as a prerequisite for approval of the charter, and also may be based on presentation of a plan for the full satisfaction of the requirements.

If it appears to the Commissioner that the proposed bank has satisfied or is reasonably probable to satisfy the requirements for issuance of a charter, the Commissioner shall issue an order approving the application for a charter and such order shall be submitted to the Commission for its review at a public hearing. The Commissioner may, in the order approving the proposed bank’s charter, impose other reasonable conditions or restrictions upon the proposed bank or the new bank, consistent with this Chapter.

If it appears to the Commissioner that the proposed bank has not satisfied and is not reasonably probable of satisfying the requirements for issuance of a charter, the Commissioner shall issue an order denying approval of the application. The applicant may, within 10 days of issuance of the order, give notice of appeal of this decision to the Commission pursuant to

G.S. 53C-2-6

.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-3-5.
Notice; public hearing.

Not less than 30 days before the public hearing of the Commission to review the Commissioner’s approval of an application, the applicant shall cause to be published a public notice containing the following:

A statement that the application has been filed with the Commissioner.

The name of the community where the proposed bank intends to locate its principal office.

A statement that a public hearing will be held to review the Commissioner’s approval of the application.

A statement that any interested person may file a written statement either favoring or protesting the chartering of the proposed bank. The statement shall note that, in order to be considered at the public hearing, all written statements from interested persons must be filed with the Commission within 30 days of the date of publication of the public notice.

At the public hearing, the Commission shall consider the findings and order of the Commissioner and shall hear such testimony as the Commissioner may wish to give or be called upon to give. To the extent that the Commission deems the information and testimony relevant to its review of the Commissioner’s order, the Commission shall receive information and hear testimony from the organizers and shall hear from any other interested persons.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-3-6.
Commission decision.

The Commission shall consider the findings and order of the Commissioner, oral testimony, and any other information and evidence, either written or oral, that comes before it at the public hearing to review the Commissioner’s approval of an application for a charter. The Commission may adjourn and reconvene the public hearing in unusual circumstances. The Commission shall affirm or reverse the Commissioner’s order. The Commission may adopt the Commissioner’s recommendation with respect to conditions for issuance of a charter, or it may modify the conditions recommended by the Commissioner. The Commission shall render its decision at the public hearing, unless unusual circumstances require postponement of the decision. The Commission’s review shall be limited to a determination of whether the criteria set forth in

G.S. 53C-3-4

have been met and whether the provisions of this Article have been followed.

If the Commission denies an application for a charter or if the Commission approves an application with conditions not set forth in the Commissioner’s approval, the applicant may appeal the denial or approval containing such conditions, as provided in

G.S. 53C-2-6

.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-3-7.
Issuance of charter.

A proposed bank shall not engage in business except as allowed under G.S. 53C-3-2(c)(1), until it receives a charter issued by the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall not issue the charter until the Commissioner is satisfied that the proposed bank has done each of the following:

Received payment in United States currency for the purchase of shares and will have satisfactory required capital upon commencing business, in each case in at least the amount required by the Commission’s order approving the application.

Elected the proposed officers and directors named in the application or other officers and directors approved by the Commissioner.

Secured deposit insurance from the FDIC.

Complied with all requirements of the Commission’s order approving the application for a charter.

Appears to be ready to commence the business of banking in the reasonable discretion of the Commissioner upon a pre-opening examination.

The charter issued by the Commissioner shall set forth any trust powers of the bank that may be full or partial trust powers.

If a bank does not open and engage in the business of banking within six months after the date its charter is issued or within such longer period as may be permitted by the Commissioner, the Commissioner shall revoke the charter.

If the Commissioner determines that a charter should not be issued following Commission approval, the applicant may appeal that decision to the Commission as provided in

G.S. 53C-2-6

.

Following the exhaustion of all appeals, the Commissioner may dissolve and liquidate the proposed bank as provided in

G.S. 53C-9-301

, or order the organizers to dissolve and liquidate the proposed bank pursuant to

G.S. 53C-9-201

, if any one of the following occurs:

The Commissioner does not recommend the issuance of a charter.

The Commission denies approval of a charter.

The charter is revoked by the Commissioner pursuant to subsection (c) of this section or other applicable law.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.